Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,143
Entity conversion authorized; definitions.

(MBCA 9.50) (a) A domestic business corporation may become a domestic unincorporated entity pursuant to a plan of entity conversion.

(b) A domestic business corporation may become a foreign unincorporated entity if the entity conversion is permitted by the laws of the foreign jurisdiction.

(c) A domestic unincorporated entity may become a domestic business corporation. If the organic law of a domestic unincorporated entity does not provide procedures for the approval of an entity conversion, the conversion shall be adopted and approved, and the entity conversion effectuated, in the same manner as a merger of the unincorporated entity. If the organic law of a domestic unincorporated entity does not provide procedures for the approval of either an entity conversion or a merger, a plan of entity conversion shall be adopted and approved, the entity conversion effectuated, and appraisal rights exercised in accordance with the procedures in sections 21-2,143 to 21-2,149 and sections 21-2,171 to 21-2,183. Without limiting the provisions of this subsection, a domestic unincorporated entity whose organic law does not provide procedures for the approval of an entity conversion shall be subject to subsection (e) of this section and subdivision (7) of section 21-2,145. For purposes of applying sections 21-2,143 to 21-2,149 and 21-2,171 to 21-2,183:

(1) The unincorporated entity, its interest holders, interests, and organic documents taken together, shall be deemed to be a domestic business corporation, shareholders, shares, and articles of incorporation, respectively and vice versa, as the context may require; and

(2) If the business and affairs of the unincorporated entity are managed by a group of persons that is not identical to the interest holders, that group shall be deemed to be the board of directors.

(d) A foreign unincorporated entity may become a domestic business corporation if the organic law of the foreign unincorporated entity authorizes it to become a corporation in another jurisdiction.

(e) If any debt security, note, or similar evidence of indebtedness for money borrowed, whether secured or unsecured, or a contract of any kind, issued, incurred, or signed by a domestic business corporation before January 1, 2017, applies to a merger of the corporation and the document does not refer to an entity conversion of the corporation, the provision shall be deemed to apply to an entity conversion of the corporation until such time as the provision is amended subsequent to that date.

(f) As used in sections 21-2,143 to 21-2,149:

(1) Converting entity means the domestic business corporation or domestic unincorporated entity that adopts a plan of entity conversion or the foreign unincorporated entity converting to a domestic business corporation; and

(2) Surviving entity means the corporation or unincorporated entity that is in existence immediately after consummation of an entity conversion pursuant to sections 21-2,143 to 21-2,149.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 143;

Laws 2015, LB157, § 6.